Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5362SV (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2208 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 708C.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter: 2 1. âCloud seedingâ means a type of weather modification 3 that attempts to change the amount or type of condensation 4 or precipitation by dispersing chemicals, including but not 5 limited to silver iodide, potassium iodide, and dry ice, into 6 the air by means of aircraft or ground generators. 7 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of public safety. 8 3. âPolluting atmospheric activityâ means the deliberate 9 discharge of any solid, liquid, gaseous, or thermal irritant, 10 contaminant, or substance, including smoke, vapor, soot, 11 fume, aerosol plume, acid, alkali, chemical, artificially 12 produced electric field, magnetic field, electromagnetic field, 13 electromagnetic pulse, sound wave, sound pollution, light 14 pollution, microwave, and all artificially produced ionizing or 15 nonionizing radiation or waste conducted in the atmosphere that 16 may have harmful consequences upon health, the environment, or 17 agriculture with the intent to manipulate or alter the weather. 18 4. âWeather engineeringâ means the deliberate manipulation 19 or alteration of the environment for the purpose of changing 20 the weather or climate by artificial means, typically 21 involving the deliberate release of polluting emissions in the 22 atmosphere via cloud seeding, for small-scale, large-scale, and 23 global-scale alteration of the environment. 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 708C.2 Prohibited acts. 25 A person shall not engage in polluting atmospheric activity, 26 cloud seeding, or any other type of weather engineering, or 27 use an unmarked or unidentified aircraft or other vehicle or 28 facility to engage in polluting atmospheric activity, cloud 29 seeding, or any other type of weather engineering, unless 30 otherwise provided by law. 31 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 708C.3 Penalties and enforcement. 32 1. The department shall immediately issue a cease and desist 33 order to a person suspected of violating section 708C.2. A 34 cease and desist order issued under this section shall have the 35 -1- LSB 5362SV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2208 weight of a court order and any violation shall be punished in 1 accordance with subsection 2. 2 2. A person who violates section 708C.2 commits a class âDâ 3 felony. A separate offense is committed by the person for each 4 day during which the violation has been conducted, repeated, 5 or continued. 6 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 7 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8